Utah statutes.
41-1a-803.   Identification numbers -- Assigning numbers -- Requirement for
sale.
(1) (a)  If a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor has a permanent
manufacturer's identification number, the number shall be used as the
vehicle's, vessel's, or outboard motor's  identification number.
(b)  If it has no permanent manufacturer's identification number, the division
shall assign an identification number to it.
(c)  An identification number assigned by the  division shall be permanently
affixed or imprinted on the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor as directed by
the division.
(2)  A person may not sell or offer for sale in this state a new vehicle,
vessel, or outboard motor without an identification number.
(3) (a)  Each permanent manufacturer's identification number for a vehicle
shall be clearly marked in an accessible place on a vehicle.
(b) (i)  Each permanent manufacturer's identification number for a vessel
shall be clearly marked in an accessible place on the starboard outboard side
of the transom or to the starboard outboard side of the hull.
(ii)  If the permanent manufacturer's identification number is displayed in a
location other than on or near the starboard outboard side of the transom, the
manufacturer shall notify the division of its location.
(4)  A person may not destroy, remove, alter, or cover an identification
number.
